Washington statutes.
RCW 19.98.030

Prices—How determined.

The prices of equipment and repair parts therefor, required to be paid to any dealer as provided in RCW 19.98.010 shall be determined by taking one hundred percent of the net cost of the invoiced price of equipment and ninety-five percent of the current net price of repair parts therefor as shown upon the supplier's price lists, catalogues, or electronic catalogs in effect at the time such contract is canceled or discontinued.

The supplier assumes transfer of ownership of equipment F.O.B. dealer location.

[ 2002 c 236 s 4; 1975 1st ex.s. c 277 s 3.]